Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5616.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-1 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Health" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-1-59. Public health advertising.
It should be the public policy of the state that no public health advertisement or regulation
shall explicitly or implicitly state that there is a safe way to take illegal drugs.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002118
========